Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,220.04
Foreign corporation; domesticated under prior law; status.

Any corporation organized under the laws of any other state which had become, prior to January 1, 2017, a body corporate of this state as a foreign domesticated corporation, shall retain such status for all purposes.

Laws 2016, LB794, § 14.